Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
662D

[VOLUNTEER
SERVICE; IMMUNITY]

Section

662D-1 Definitions

662D-2 Scope of immunity

662D-3 Exception

662D-4 Limited liability for volunteers for
activities at

public skateboard parks

Cross References

Voluntary emergency medical disaster response personnel, see
§321-23.3.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next